regression_test_data/reverse-bil/expected_output.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 1
	Entries: 44
	Sdefs: 13
	Paradigms: 1
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools reverse-bil test/sample.eo-en.dix regression_test_data/reverse-bil/actual_output.dix

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet></alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="pron" /> 
    <sdef n="web" /> 
    <sdef n="GD" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="m" /> 
    <sdef n="num" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="al" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" /> 
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="adv" /> 
    <sdef n="guio" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
<pardef n="MF_GD">
  <e r="RL"><p><l><s n="GD"/></l><r></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l><s n="f"/></l><r></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l><s n="m"/></l><r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  </pardefs>

  <section id="main" type="standard">

    <!-- Numerals -->
<e>       <p><l>zero<s n="num"/></l>                   <r>nulo<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>one<s n="num"/></l>                    <r>unu<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>two<s n="num"/></l>                    <r>du<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>three<s n="num"/></l>                  <r>tri<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>four<s n="num"/></l>                   <r>kvar<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>five<s n="num"/></l>                   <r>kvin<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>eleven<s n="num"/></l>                 <r>dek<b/>unu<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>twelve<s n="num"/></l>                 <r>dek<b/>du<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>thirteen<s n="num"/></l>               <r>dek<b/>tri<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>fourteen<s n="num"/></l>               <r>dek<b/>kvar<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>fifteen<s n="num"/></l>                <r>dek<b/>kvin<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>twenty<s n="num"/></l>                 <r>dudek<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>thirty<s n="num"/></l>                 <r>tridek<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>forty<s n="num"/></l>                  <r>kvardek<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>fifty<s n="num"/></l>                  <r>kvindek<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>Zapatista<b/>National<b/>Liberation<b/>Army<s n="np"/><s n="al"/></l><r>Zapatista<b/>Armeo<b/>de<b/>Nacia<b/>Liberiĝo<s n="np"/><s n="al"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <i>ABC<b/>News<s n="np"/><s n="al"/></i></e>


<e>       <p><l>Manuel<s n="np"/></l>                  <r>Manuelo<s n="np"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>María<s n="np"/></l>                   <r>Maria<s n="np"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>Marta<s n="np"/></l>                   <r>Marta<s n="np"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>Martín<s n="np"/></l>                  <r>Marteno<s n="np"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <i>Jaime<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></i></e>
<e>       <i>Gerardo<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></i></e>
<e>       <i>Paris<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></i></e>
<e>       <i>Robert<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></i></e>


    <!-- Nouns with gender in Esperanto but not in English -->

<e>       <p><l>Muslim<s n="n"/></l>                   <r>islamano<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="MF_GD"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>Catholic<s n="n"/></l>                 <r>katoliko<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="MF_GD"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>Christian<s n="n"/></l>                <r>kristano<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="MF_GD"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>Protestant<s n="n"/></l>               <r>protestanto<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="MF_GD"/></e>

<e>       <p><l>face<s n="n"/></l>                     <r>vizaĝo<s n="n"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>face<s n="n"/></l>                     <r>supraĵo<s n="n"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>face<s n="vblex"/></l>                 <r>defii<s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>face<s n="vblex"/></l>                 <r>maleviti<s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>hesitate<s n="vblex"/></l>             <r>heziti<s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>hesitate<s n="vblex"/></l>             <r>malvoli<s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>hesitate<s n="vblex"/></l>             <r>domaĝi<s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>hide<s n="vblex"/></l>                 <r>malvidigi<s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>hide<s n="vblex"/></l>                 <r>kaŝi<s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>hide<s n="n"/></l>                     <r>felo<s n="n"/></r></p></e>

<!-- Already is <e><l>unuavice<adv></l><r>primarily<adv></r></e>-->
<e i="yes"><p><l>primarily<s n="adv"/></l>             <r>ĉefe<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

<!-- Already is <e><l>ĉiaokaze<adv></l><r>regardless<adv></r></e>-->
<e r="RL" c="añadir también 'regardless of' como 'a pesar de'"><p><l>regardless<s n="adv"/></l><r>ĉiakoste<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>weekly<s n="adv"/></l>                 <r>ĉiusemajne<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

<!-- Some checks for special characters, like & and " -->
<e lm="AT&amp;T" c="AT&amp;T"><p><l>AT&amp;T<s n="n"/></l><r>AT&amp;T<s n="n"/></r></p></e>
<e lm="AT&quot;T" c="AT&quot;T"><p><l>AT&quot;T<s n="n"/></l><r>AT&quot;T<s n="n"/></r></p></e>
  </section>
</dictionary>
